Louisiana, session 2026, HB231.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 14:79(I) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §79. Violation of protective orders
8 * * *
9 I. Violation of protective orders shall also include the intentional evasion of
10 service of process of any lawful order of the court issued pursuant to R.S. 9:361 et
11 seq., R.S. 9:372, R.S. 28:53.2, R.S. 46:2131 et seq., R.S. 46:2151, R.S. 46:2181 et
12 seq., Children's Code Articles 1564 et seq., Code of Civil Procedure Article 3601 or
13 3607.1, or Code of Criminal Procedure Article 30, 320, or 871.1.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.